Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,103
Penalty clause for contest.

A provision in a will purporting to penalize any interested person for contesting the will or instituting other proceedings relating to the estate is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 181, UPC § 3-905.

A no contest clause is unenforceable if probable cause exists for instituting proceedings. In re Estate of Barger, 303 Neb. 817, 931 N.W.2d 660 (2019).